Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 6. Enforcement Remedies.
§ 63.2-1941.
Additional enforcement remedies.

In addition to its other enforcement remedies, the Division of Child Support Enforcement is authorized to:

Attach unemployment benefits through the Virginia Employment Commission pursuant to §

60.2-608

and workers’ compensation benefits through the Workers’ Compensation Commission pursuant to §

65.2-531

; and

Suspend an individual’s driving privileges pursuant to §

46.2-320.1

.

History.

2002, c. 747; 2012, c. 829; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 829 substituted “§

46.2-320

.1” for “§

46.2-320

” at the end of subdivision 2.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “driving privileges” for “driver’s license” in subdivision 2.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.3 Relief from Levy, et seq.
Rendleman.